Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-134, as
last amended by Section 6, Chapter 323, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 3-134), is amended to read as follows:
Section 3-134. A. For written applications filed after July 1,
2024, prior to submission of the application to a proposed sponsor
seeking to establish a charter school or to the Statewide Charter
School Board to establish a virtual charter school, the applicant
shall be required to complete training which shall not exceed ten
(10) hours provided by the Statewide Charter School Board on the
Req. No. 14551 Page 1

proc ess and requirements for establishing a charter school or
virtual charter school. The sponsor of a charter school that enters
into a new or renewed sponsorship contract on or after July 1, 2024,
shall be required to complete training provided by the Statewide
Charter School Board or an organization approved by the Statewide
Charter School Board on the oversight duties of the sponsor. The
Board shall develop and implement the training and publish a list of
organizations approved to provide training by July 1, 2024. The
Board and organizations approved by the Board may provide the
training in any format and manner determined to be efficient and
effective including, but not limited to, web-based training.
B. Except as otherwise provided for in Section 3-137 of this
title, an applicant seeking to establish a virtual charter school
shall submit a written application to the Statewide Charter School
Board, and an applicant seeking to establish a charter school shall
submit a written application to the proposed sponsor as provided for
in subsection E of this section. The application shall include:
1. A mission statement for the charter school or virtual
charter school;
2. A description including, but not limited to, background
information of the organizational structure and the governing board
of the charter school or virtual charter school;
3. A financial plan for the first five (5) years of operation
of the charter school or virtual charter school and a description of
Req. No. 14551 Page 2

the treasurer or other officers or persons who shall have primary
responsibility for the finances of the charter school or virtual
charter school. Such person shall have demonstrated experience in
school finance or the equivalent thereof;
4. A description of the hiring policy of the charter school or
virtual charter school;
5. The name of the applicant or applicants and requested
sponsor;
6. A description of the facility and location of the charter
school;
7. A description of the grades being served;
8. An outline of criteria designed to measure the effectiveness
of the charter school or virtual charter school;
9. Documentation that the applicants completed training as set
forth in subsection A of this section;
10. A description of the minimum and maximum enrollment planned
per year for each term of the charter contract;
11. The proposed calendar for the charter school or virtual
charter school and sample daily schedule;
12. Unless otherwise authorized by law or regulation, a
description of the academic program aligned with state standards;
13. A description of the instructional design of the charter
school or virtual charter school including the type of learning

Req. No. 14551 Page 3

envi ronment, class size and structure, curriculum overview, and
teaching methods;
14. The plan for using internal and external assessments to
measure and report student progress on the performance framework
developed by the applicant in accordance with Section 3-136 of this
title;
15. The plans for identifying and successfully serving students
with disabilities, students who are English language learners, and
students who are academically behind;
16. A description of cocurricular or extracurricular programs
and how they will be funded and delivered;
17. Plans and time lines for student recruitment and enrollment
including lottery procedures;
18. The student discipline policies for the charter school or
virtual charter school including those for special education
students;
19. An organizational chart that clearly presents the
organizational structure of the charter school or virtual charter
school, including lines of authority and reporting between the
governing board, staff, any related bodies such as advisory bodies
or parent and teacher councils, and any external organizations that
will play a role in managing the school;
20. A clear description of the roles and responsibilities for
the governing board, the leadership and management team for the
Req. No. 14551 Page 4

char ter school or virtual charter school, and any other entities
shown in the organizational chart;
21. The leadership and teacher employment policies for the
charter school or virtual charter school;
22. Proposed governing bylaws;
23. Explanations of any partnerships or contractual
partnerships central to the operations or mission of the charter
school or virtual charter school;
24. The plans for providing transportation, food service, and
all other significant operational or ancillary services;
25. Opportunities and expectations for parental involvement;
26. A detailed school start-up plan that identifies tasks, time
lines, and responsible individuals;
27. A description of the financial plan and policies for the
charter school or virtual charter school including financial
controls and audit requirements;
28. A description of the insurance coverage the charter school
or virtual charter school will obtain;
29. Start-up and five-year budgets with clearly stated
assumptions;
30. Start-up and first-year cash-flow projections with clearly
stated assumptions;
31. Evidence of anticipated fundraising contributions, if
claimed in the application;
Req. No. 14551 Page 5

32. A sound facilities plan including backup or contingency
plans if appropriate;
33. A requirement that the charter school or virtual charter
school governing board meet no fewer than ten (10) months of the
year in the state and that for those charter schools outside of
counties with a population of five hundred thousand (500,000) or
more, that a minimum of two (2) members are residents within the
geographic boundary of the charter school;
34. A requirement that the charter school or virtual charter
school follow the requirements of the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act and
Oklahoma Open Records Act; and
35. A copy of any proposed contract between the governing board
of a charter school or virtual charter school and an educational
management organization, as defined by Section 5-200 of this title,
which meets the requirements of the Oklahoma Charter Schools Act.
C. A board of education of a public school district, public
body, public or private college or university, private person, or
private organization may contract with a sponsor to establish a
charter school or virtual charter school. A private school shall
not be eligible to contract for a charter school or virtual charter
school under the provisions of the Oklahoma Charter Schools Act.
D. The sponsor of a charter school is the board of education of
a school district, a higher education institution, a private
institution of higher learning accredited pursuant to Section 4103
Req. No. 14551 Page 6

of t his title, a federally recognized Indian tribe which meets the
criteria established in Section 3-132 of this title, or beginning
July 1, 2024, the Statewide Charter School Board. Any sponsor
authorized pursuant to subsection A of Section 3-132 of this title
may sponsor one or more charter schools. The physical location of a
charter school sponsored by a board of education of a school
district shall be within the boundaries of the sponsoring school
district. The physical location of a charter school sponsored by
the Statewide Charter School Board pursuant to paragraph 6 of
subsection A of Section 3-132 of this title shall be in the school
district in which the application originated.
E. 1. Beginning July 1, 2024 2026, any application seeking to
establish a charter school in this state shall may be submitted
first to the school district in which the proposed charter school is
to be located. The school district board of education shall approve
or deny the application within sixty (60) days of receipt of the
application. If the charter school application is denied, nothing
shall prohibit an applicant from submitting a revised application to
the school district board of education, which shall approve or deny
the revised application within sixty (60) days of receipt of the
application.
2. An applicant for a charter school may elect to submit an
application to a proposed sponsor listed in paragraphs 2 through 6
of subsection A of Section 3-132 of this title, which shall either
Req. No. 14551 Page 7

acce pt or reject sponsorship of the charter school within ninety
(90) days of receipt of the application. If the proposed sponsor
rejects the application, it shall notify the applicant in writing of
the reasons for the rejection. The applicant may submit a revised
application for reconsideration to the proposed sponsor within
thirty (30) days after receiving notification of the rejection. The
proposed sponsor shall accept or reject the revised application
within thirty (30) days of its receipt.
3. An applicant for a charter school that has been denied
pursuant to paragraph 1 of this subsection may submit an application
to a proposed sponsor listed in paragraphs 2 through 6 of subsection
A of Section 3-132 of this title, which shall either accept or
reject sponsorship of the charter school within ninety (90) days of
receipt of the application. If the proposed sponsor rejects the
application, it shall notify the applicant in writing of the reasons
for the rejection. The applicant may submit a revised application
for reconsideration to the proposed sponsor within thirty (30) days
after receiving notification of the rejection. The proposed sponsor
shall accept or reject the revised application within thirty (30)
days of its receipt.
3. 4. Beginning July 1, 2024, an applicant for a virtual
charter school shall submit an application to the Statewide Charter
School Board, which shall either accept or reject sponsorship of the
virtual charter school within ninety (90) days of receipt of the
Req. No. 14551 Page 8

appl ication. If the application is rejected, the Statewide Charter
School Board shall notify the applicant in writing of the reasons
for the rejection. The applicant may submit a revised application
for reconsideration to the Statewide Charter school Board within
thirty (30) days after receiving notification of the rejection. The
Statewide Charter School Board shall accept or reject the revised
application within thirty (30) days of its receipt.
F. A board of education of a school district, a higher
education institution, a private institution of higher learning
accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of this title, or a federally
recognized Indian tribe shall notify the State Board of Education
and the Statewide Charter School Board when it accepts sponsorship
of a charter school. The notification shall include a copy of the
charter of the charter school.
G. Applicants for charter schools and virtual charter schools
proposed to be sponsored by the Statewide Charter School Board may,
upon rejection of a revised application, proceed to binding
arbitration under the commercial rules of the American Arbitration
Association with costs of the arbitration to be borne by the
applicant.
H. If a board of education of a school district, a higher
education institution, a private institution of higher learning
accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of this title, or a federally
recognized Indian tribe accepts sponsorship of a charter school, the
Req. No. 14551 Page 9

admi nistrative, fiscal, and oversight responsibilities of the school
district, the higher education institution, the private institution
of higher learning accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of this
title, or the federally recognized Indian tribe shall be listed in
the contract. No administrative, fiscal, or oversight
responsibilities of a charter school shall be delegated to a school
district unless the school district agrees to enter into a contract
to assume the responsibilities.
I. A sponsor of a public charter school shall have the
following powers and duties over charter schools it sponsors, and
the Statewide Charter School Board shall have the following powers
and duties over the charter schools and virtual charter schools it
sponsors:
1. Provide services and oversight of the operations of charter
schools or virtual charter schools in the state through annual
performance reviews and reauthorization;
2. Solicit and evaluate charter applications;
3. Approve quality charter applications that meet identified
educational needs and promote a diversity of educational choices;
4. Decline to approve weak or inadequate charter applications;
5. Negotiate and execute sound charter contracts with each
approved public charter school or virtual charter school;
6. Approve or deny proposed contracts between the governing
board of a charter school or virtual charter school and an
Req. No. 14551 Page 10

educ ational management organization, as defined by section 5-200 of
this title;
7. Monitor, in accordance with charter contract terms, the
performance and legal compliance of charter schools and virtual
charter schools; and
8. Determine whether each charter contract merits renewal,
nonrenewal, or revocation.
J. Sponsors shall establish a procedure for accepting,
approving, and disapproving charter school applications in
accordance with subsection E of this section. The Statewide Charter
School Board shall post its application, application process, and
application time frames on the Board's website.
K. Sponsors including the Statewide Charter School Board shall
develop and maintain chartering policies and practices consistent
with recognized principles and standards for quality charter
sponsoring in all major areas of sponsoring responsibility including
organizational capacity and infrastructure, soliciting and
evaluating charter school and virtual charter school applications,
performance contracting, ongoing charter school and virtual charter
school oversight and evaluation, and charter contract renewal
decision-making.
L. Sponsors acting in their official capacity shall be immune
from civil and criminal liability with respect to all activities
related to a charter school with which they contract.
Req. No. 14551 Page 11

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-14551 SW 01/07/26

















Req. No. 14551 Page 12